Florida, session 2026, HB531.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraphs (p) and (q) are added to subsection
(2) of section 409.967, Florida Statutes, to read:
409.967 Managed care plan accountability.—
(2) The agency shall establish such contract requirements
as are necessary for the operation of the statewide managed care
program. In addition to any other provisions the agency may deem
necessary, the contract must require:
(p) Prior authorization reviews.—For any claims in which a
Medicaid managed care plan has given prior authorization,
prepayment or postpayment review may not include review for
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb531-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 531 2026
medical necessity for the previously approved equipment,
supplies, or services.
(q) Durable medical equipment.—Managed care plans, or
their subcontractors, shall provide coverage for durable medical
equipment or complex rehabilitation technology from any
qualified durable medical equipment or complex rehabilitation
technology provider within the provider network which the
enrollee chooses. The agency shall adopt rules to implement this
paragraph, including, but not limited to:
1. Authorizing enrollees to choose the provider, within
the provider network, from which they can receive eligible
durable medical equipment or complex rehabilitation technology.
2. Providing a procedure within the grievance resolution
process adopted under paragraph (h) for enrollees to file a
complaint if they believe they were not granted authority to
choose their provider from within the provider network, as
authorized under this paragraph.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 2 of 2
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb531-00